Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Articles of Incorporation

§ 17-19-1001.
Authority to amend.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles or to delete a provision not required in the articles. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1002.
Amendment by directors.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation’s articles without member approval:

To extend the duration of the corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by law;

To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

To delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the secretary of state;

To change the corporate name by substituting the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or “ltd.,” for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting or changing a geographical attribution to the name; or

To make any other change expressly permitted by this act to be made by director action.

If a corporation has no members, its incorporators, until directors have been chosen, and thereafter its board of directors, may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation’s articles subject to any approval required pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1030

. The corporation shall provide notice of any meeting at which an amendment is to be voted upon. The notice shall be in accordance with W.S. 17-19-822(c). The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider a proposed amendment to the articles and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment or state the general nature of the amendment. The amendment shall be approved by a majority of the directors in office at the time the amendment is adopted.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(v), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1003.
Amendment by directors and members.

For corporations with directors and members, unless this act, the articles, bylaws, the members, (acting pursuant to subsection (b) of this section), or the board of directors, (acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section) require a greater vote or voting by class, an amendment to a corporation’s articles to be adopted shall be approved:

By the board if the corporation is a public benefit or religious corporation and the amendment does not relate to the number of directors, the composition of the board, the term of office of directors, or the method or way in which directors are elected or selected;

Except as provided in W.S. 17-19-1002(a), by the members by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles authorized by W.S.

17-19-1030

.

The members may condition the amendment’s adoption on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the board initiates an amendment to the articles or board approval is required by subsection (a) of this section to adopt an amendment to the articles, the board may condition the amendment’s adoption on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or any other basis.

If the board or the members seek to have the amendment approved by the members at a membership meeting, the corporation shall give notice to its members of the proposed membership meeting in writing in accordance with W.S.

17-19-705

. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

If the board or the members seek to have the amendment approved by the members by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1004.
Class voting by members on amendments.

The members of a class in a public benefit corporation are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the articles if the amendment would change the rights of that class as to voting in a manner different than the amendment affects another class or members of another class.

The members of a class in a mutual benefit corporation are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the articles if the amendment would:

Affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer of memberships in a manner different than the amendment would affect another class;

Change the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of another class;

Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for that class;

Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class;

Effect an exchange, reclassification or termination of the memberships of that class; or

Authorize a new class of memberships.

The members of a class of a religious corporation are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the articles only if a class vote is provided for in the articles or bylaws.

If a class is to be divided into two (2) or more classes as a result of an amendment to the articles of a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation, the amendment shall be approved by the members of each class that would be created by the amendment.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws of a religious corporation, if a class vote is required to approve an amendment to the articles of a corporation, the amendment shall be approved by the members of the class by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast by the class or a majority of the voting power of the class, whichever is less.

A class of members of a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the articles and bylaws provide that the class cannot vote on the proposed amendment.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1005.
Articles of amendment.

A corporation amending its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted;

The date of each amendment’s adoption;

If approval of members was not required, a statement to that effect and a statement that the amendment was approved by a sufficient vote of the board of directors or incorporators;

If approval by members was required:

The designation, number of memberships outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each class indisputably voting on the amendment; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the amendment by each class entitled to vote separately on the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by each class and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each class was sufficient for approval by that class.

If approval of the amendment by some person or persons other than the members, the board or the incorporators is required pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1030

, a statement that the approval was obtained.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-1006.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A corporation’s board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time with or without approval by members or any other person.

The restatement may include one (1) or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring approval by the members or any other person, it shall be adopted as provided in W.S.

17-19-1003

.

If the restatement includes an amendment requiring approval by members, the board shall submit the restatement to the members for their approval.

If the board seeks to have the restatement approved by the members at a membership meeting, the corporation shall notify each of its members of the proposed membership meeting in writing in accordance with W.S.

17-19-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the restatement that identifies any amendments or other change it would make in the articles.

If the board seeks to have the restatement approved by the members by written ballot or written consent, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the restatement that identifies any amendments or other change it would make in the articles.

A restatement requiring approval by the members shall be approved by the same vote as an amendment to articles under W.S.

17-19-1003

.

If the restatement includes an amendment requiring approval pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1030

, the board shall submit the restatement for approval.

A corporation restating its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate setting forth:

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring approval by the members or any other person other than the board of directors and, if it does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; or

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring approval by the members, the information required by W.S.

17-19-1005

; and

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring approval by a person whose approval is required pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1030

, a statement that the approval was obtained.

Duly adopted restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them.

The secretary of state may certify restated articles of incorporation, as the articles of incorporation currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (h) of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-1007.
Amendment pursuant to judicial reorganization.

A corporation’s articles may be amended without board approval or approval by the members or approval required pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1030

to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute if the articles after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by W.S.

17-19-202

.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court’s order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1008.
Effect of amendment.

An amendment to articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, any requirement or limitation imposed upon the corporation or any property held by it by virtue of any trust upon which the property is held by the corporation or the existing rights of persons other than members of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation’s name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.